Hawaii statutes.
§147-24 Inspection. The board of
agriculture may designate any employee or agent of the department to inspect or
classify fresh and processed agricultural commodities. [L 1955, c 258, §6; RL
1955, §22-24; am L 1959, c 267, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c
132, §2; HRS §147-24; am L 1983, c 257, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next